Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-508 Closing a support facility.
A Hawaii financial institution shall provide notice to the commissioner of its
closure of a support facility within thirty days of the closing. The notice
shall contain the location of the support facility closed and the date of
closing. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 228, §23]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next